District of Columbia statutes.
47-459.01

Repealed

Amnesty.

Repealed.

Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 105, 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(k), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-459.1.